Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.230

Commute trip reduction—Use of public funds.

State agencies may, under the internal revenue code rules, use public funds to financially assist agency-approved incentives for alternative commute modes, including but not limited to carpools, vanpools, purchase of transit and ferry passes, and guaranteed ride home programs, if the financial assistance is an element of the agency's commute trip reduction program as required under RCW 70A.15.4000 through 70A.15.4100. This section does not permit any payment for the use of state-owned vehicles for commuter ride sharing.

[ 2021 c 65 s 31; 1995 c 215 s 1; 1993 c 394 s 6.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Finding—Purpose—1993 c 394: See note following RCW 43.01.220.